North Carolina statutes. Chapter 53. Regulation of Financial Services.
Article 5. Stockholders. [Repealed]

§§ 53-39 through 53-42.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

History.

S. 53-39; 1933, c. 159, s. 2; 1935, c. 79, s. 1; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-40; 1921, c. 4, s. 23; C.S., s. 219(c); repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-41; 1921, c. 4, s. 25; C.S., s. 219(e); repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-42: Ex. Sess. 1921, c. 56, s. 3; C.S., s. 219(f); 1925, c. 117; 1931, c. 243, s. 5; 1959, c. 157; 1995, c. 129, s. 8; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-42.1; 1967, c. 789, s. 5; 1981, c. 671, ss. 3-6; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.